apertium-rus-orv.orv.dix
      <!-- PARDEFS: Verbs -->  
    <pardef n="v_Cons-ти_hard">
      <e><p><l>ти</l><r><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѫ</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>еши</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>еть</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>евѣ</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ета</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ета</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>емъ</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ете</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѫтъ</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>охъ</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>е</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>е</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>оховѣ</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>оста</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>оста</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>охомъ</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>осте</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ошѧ</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>яхъ</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>яше</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>яше</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>яховѣ</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>яста</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>яста</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>яхомъ</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ясте</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>яхъ</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r><s n="imper"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r><s n="imper"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѣвѣ</l><r><s n="imper"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѣта</l><r><s n="imper"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѣвѣ</l><r><s n="imper"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѣте</l><r><s n="imper"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="v_а-ти_hard">
      <e><p><l>ати</l><r><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѫ</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>еши</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>еть</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>евѣ</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ета</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ета</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>емъ</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ете</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѫтъ</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>хъ</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ховѣ</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ста</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ста</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>хомъ</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>сте</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>шѧ</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>яхъ</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>яше</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>яше</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>яховѣ</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>яста</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>яста</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>яхомъ</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ясте</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>яхъ</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r><s n="imper"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r><s n="imper"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѣвѣ</l><r><s n="imper"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѣта</l><r><s n="imper"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѣвѣ</l><r><s n="imper"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѣте</l><r><s n="imper"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="v_у-ти_hard">
      <e><p><l>ути</l><r><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѫ</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>еши</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>еть</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>евѣ</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ета</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ета</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>емъ</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ете</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѫтъ</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>хъ</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ховѣ</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ста</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ста</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>хомъ</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>сте</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>шѧ</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>яхъ</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>яше</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>яше</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>яховѣ</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>яста</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>яста</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>яхомъ</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ясте</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>яхъ</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r><s n="imper"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r><s n="imper"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѣвѣ</l><r><s n="imper"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѣта</l><r><s n="imper"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѣмь</l><r><s n="imper"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѣте</l><r><s n="imper"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="идти"><p><l>ид</l><r>идти</r></p><par n="v_Cons-ти_hard"/></e>
    <e lm="бегати"><p><l>бег</l><r>бегати</r></p><par n="v_а-ти_hard"/></e>
